District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.11

Transfer of authority.

All the authority of the CFO under this subchapter, except the duties of the CFO under § 2-1217.05 shall be transferred to the Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation (“Board”) in accordance with subchapter X of this chapter, upon notification to the CFO that the Board is ready to assume the functions.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-143, § 12, 45 DCR 3724
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 201, 45 DCR 5187
1981 Ed., § 1-2293.11.
For temporary addition of §§ 1-2293.1 to 1-2293.11 1981 Ed. see note to § 2-1217.01.
Transfer of powers, duties, and responsibilities from Chief Financial Officer of the District: Section 30(e)(1) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that the provisions of this subchapter shall continue in full force and effect provided that the Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation shall exercise all functions of the Chief Financial Officer of the District except the duties under § 1-2293.5 and after the date of notice from the Board to the Chief Financial Officer that the Board is ready to assume such functions.